Hawaii, session 2025, HB1500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The [price for school meals shall be set by the department to ensure that moneys received from the sale of the meals shall be not less than one-half of the cost of preparing the meals.  The prices for school meals may be adjusted annually based on the previous year's costs rounded to the nearest five cents; provided that the] department by rule shall provide a lower rate or free meals to children based on their economic need." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.